Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.100

Execution against homestead—Application for appointment of appraiser.

When execution for the enforcement of a judgment obtained in a case not within the classes enumerated in RCW 6.13.080 is levied upon the homestead, the judgment creditor shall apply to the superior court of the county in which the homestead is situated for the appointment of a person to appraise the value thereof.

[ 1987 c 442 s 210; 1895 c 64 s 9; RRS s 537. Formerly RCW 6.12.140.]